Massachusetts, session 194th, H3345.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Chapter 2 of the General Laws as appearing the 2016 Official Edition is hereby amended 
by inserting at the end thereof the following section:- 
Section 64. The Blanding's turtle shall be the official turtle or turtle emblem of the 
Commonwealth.